src/Main/Hurrian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols .NUM -INF -SG -NMN -RES -STAT .NEG -ANTIP -PAT -CVB -PTCP 1PRON 2PRON 3PRON .PASS -IMP -MOD .ACT -POT -OPT -DESID -1JUSS -3JUSS -PURP .A -MED .PFV -NEG 1SG 2SG 3SG 1PL 2PL 3PL .SG .PL -PL -RELAT -1POSS -2POSS -3POSS .ABS .ERG -ERG -GEN -DAT -DIR -ABL -COM -ESS -INS -EQU1 -EQU2 -ASSOC -ABL/INS -DIR/LOC -EPNTH =1SG =2SG =3SG =1PL =2PL =3PL =CON =EMPH =PART @P.STACKING.ON@ @D.STACKING.ON@ .PRS -PST -FUT -TR -INT -1A -2A -3A @P.VI.ON@ @R.VI.ON@ @D.VI.ON@ @P.DER.ON@ @R.DER.ON@ @D.DER.ON@ @P.SUBJ.1SG@ @P.SUBJ.2SG@ @P.SUBJ.3SG@ @P.SUBJ.1PL@ @P.SUBJ.2PL@ @P.SUBJ.3PL@ @D.SUBJ.1SG@ @D.SUBJ.2SG@ @D.SUBJ.3SG@ @D.SUBJ.1PL@ @D.SUBJ.2PL@ @D.SUBJ.3PL@ @P.NUM.PL@ @R.NUM.PL@ @D.NUM.PL@ ,Noun ,Verb ,Adv ,Conj ,Pron ,Num -CAUS -ITER -INGR -FACT -RECP

Definitions
	A = a|ā;
	E = e|ē;
	I = i|ī;
	O = o|ō;
	U = u|ū;

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Adverb;
Conjunction;
Pronoun;
Numeral;
Noun;

LEXICON vs
,Verb:0 		PostVs;

LEXICON PostVs
-STAT:-ɛ		WordBoundary;
-STAT:-ɪ		WordBoundary;
-STAT:-o		NonErgativeNegation;
-NEG:-obur		WordBoundary;
-NEG:-ōbur		WordBoundary;
CommonVerb;

LEXICON v
vi;
vt;

LEXICON vi
@D.DER.ON@,Verb:@D.DER.ON@0		PostVi;
@R.DER.ON@						PostVi;

LEXICON PostVi
@P.VI.ON@			Tense;
-IMP:-a				WordBoundary;
CommonVerb;
-INT-b:-a-b			WordBoundary;
@P.VI.ON@@P.DER.ON@	VerbalDerivation;

LEXICON vt
@D.DER.ON@,Verb:@D.DER.ON@0		PostVt;
@R.DER.ON@						PostVt;

LEXICON PostVt
Tense;
-IMP:-e			OptFinalModalPlural;
-IMP:-i			OptFinalModalElement;
-IMP.PASS:-o	OptFinalModalElement;
CommonVerb;
@P.DER.ON@		VerbalDerivation;

LEXICON Antipassive
-ANTIP:-i		PostAtipassive;
-ANTIP:-ī		PostAtipassive;

LEXICON PostAtipassive
-b				WordBoundary;
-PTCP:-ri		WordBoundary;
OptNominalization;
NonErgativeNegation;

LEXICON NonErgativeNegation
-NEG:-kkɑ		OptNominalization;

LEXICON OptFinalModalPlural
FinalModalPlural;
WordBoundary;

LEXICON OptFinalModalElement
-ž		#;
WordBoundary;

LEXICON CommonVerb
Nonfinite;
Polarity;
Aspect;
Mood;
Voice;

LEXICON VerbalDerivation
-aḫḫ	InheritedValence;
-al		InheritedValence;
-am		InheritedValence;
-CAUS:-an		vt;
-CAUS:-ān		vt;
-CAUS:-ann		vt;
-ITER:-ar		InheritedValence;
-ITER:-ār		InheritedValence;
-āz		InheritedValence;
-až		InheritedValence;
-āž		InheritedValence;
-ad		InheritedValence;
!-il	InheritedValence;
-INGR:-ill		InheritedValence;
-iž		InheritedValence;
!-l		InheritedValence;
!-d		InheritedValence;
-FACT:-oġ		InheritedValence;
-FACT:-ōġ		InheritedValence;
-FACT:-ūġ		InheritedValence;
-iġ		InheritedValence;
-ōl		InheritedValence;
-ol		InheritedValence;
-om		InheritedValence;
-ōr		InheritedValence;
-ūr		InheritedValence;
-ur		InheritedValence;
!-ōž	InheritedValence;
!-ud	InheritedValence;
-RECP:-ugar		InheritedValence;
-RECP:-ugār		InheritedValence;
-upp	InheritedValence;
-RES:-ɑšt	InheritedValence;
-RES:-ōšt	InheritedValence;
-RES:-ošt	InheritedValence;
-RES:-išt	InheritedValence;
-ešḫ	InheritedValence;
-ull	i;
-ūll	i;

LEXICON InheritedValence
@R.VI.ON@	vi;
@D.VI.ON@	vt;

LEXICON Nonfinite
Converb;
-PAT:-o			Participle;
-PAT:-au		Participle;
-PURP:-ai		PurposiveConverbNumber;
-INF:-umme		WordBoundary;
-INF:-umm(e)	VocalicCase;
-INF:-umme		ConsonantalCase;

LEXICON Converb
-CVB:-o+m+ae	ConverbCont;

LEXICON ConverbCont
-n  WordBoundary;
WordBoundary;

LEXICON PurposiveConverbNumber
SingularMarker; 
NonSecondPersonPluralMarker;

LEXICON SingularMarker
-SG:-n		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Participle
-PTCP:-re		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Polarity
-NEG:-ōd	Aspect;
-NEG:-ūd	Aspect;
-NEG:-ud	Aspect;

LEXICON Aspect
@P.NUM.PL@	PluralPerfective;
Perfective;

LEXICON PluralPerfective
-PL.ERG:-id	Perfective;

LEXICON Perfective
-TR.PFV:-ō	PerfectiveCont;
-TR.PFV:-o	PerfectiveCont;

LEXICON PerfectiveCont
-3A.SG:-m	WordBoundary;
-b			WordBoundary;
@R.NUM.PL@	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Mood
-MOD.ACT-l:-i-l		ilMoods;
-o-l				olMoods;
PremodalPlural;
-i		Voluntative;
!Cohortative;
Potential;
Optative;
Desiderative;
-i		Jussive;
-i		Vetitive;
IntransitiveVetitive;

LEXICON ilMoods
Potential;
Optative;
Desiderative;
Purposive;

LEXICON olMoods
Potential;
Optative;
Purposive;

LEXICON PremodalPlural
-PL.A:-it						PostPluralMood;
-PL.A:-(i)t						PostPluralMood;

LEXICON PostPluralMood
Desiderative;
Jussive;
IntransitiveVetitive;

! Modal suffixes

LEXICON Voluntative
-1JUSS:-le		WordBoundary;
-NEG:-vā		NegatedVoluntative;
-NEG:-va		NegatedVoluntative;

LEXICON NegatedVoluntative
-1JUSS:-llī		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Cohortative
-i		FinalModalPlural;
-o		FinalModalPlural;

LEXICON Potential
-POT:-ēva		OptFinalModalPlural;
-POT:-eva		OptFinalModalPlural;

LEXICON Optative
-OPT-ž:-e-ž		WordBoundary;
-OPT-ž:-ae-ž	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Desiderative
-DESID:-ānni	WordBoundary;
-DESID:-anni	WordBoundary;

LEXICON Jussive
-3JUSS:-en		WordBoundary;
-3JUSS:-e(n)	#;

LEXICON Vetitive
-NEG:-vā		Jussive;
-NEG:-va		Jussive;

LEXICON IntransitiveVetitive
-INT-NEG:-ō-v(ā)	Jussive;

LEXICON Purposive
<%-PURP .x. %- A I>		PostPurposive;

LEXICON PostPurposive
SingularMarker;
OptFinalModalElement;

LEXICON FinalModalPlural
-PL.A:-ž		WordBoundary;

LEXICON Voice
-MED:-u		OptSyntacticParticle;
-MED:-ū		OptSyntacticParticle;
-MED:-ūv	OptSyntacticParticle;

LEXICON Tense
Present;
-PST:-ōž	NonPresent;
-PST:-ož	NonPresent;
-FUT:-ēd	NonPresent;
-FUT:-ed	NonPresent;

LEXICON Present
@R.VI.ON@					Intransitivity;
@D.VI.ON@@D.DER.ON@-TR:@D.VI.ON@@D.DER.ON@-i	MarkingValence;
@D.VI.ON@@D.DER.ON@-TR:@D.VI.ON@@D.DER.ON@-ī	MarkingValence;
@D.VI.ON@@R.DER.ON@			MarkingValence;
@D.VI.ON@					NotMarkingValence;
Negated;
CommonPostTense;

LEXICON NonPresent
@R.VI.ON@-INT:@R.VI.ON@-t	Intransitivity;
@D.VI.ON@					Person;
Mood;
Voice;
-i 				NegatedNonPresentMarkingValence;
-ī 				NegatedNonPresentMarkingValence;
NegatedNonPresentNotMarkingValence;
CommonPostTense;

LEXICON CommonPostTense
@D.VI.ON@		Antipassive;

LEXICON NegatedNonPresentMarkingValence
NegatedFirstPersonSingular;
NegatedThirdPersonSingular;

LEXICON NegatedNonPresentNotMarkingValence
NegatedFirstPersonPlural;
NegatedSecondPersonPlural;

LEXICON Intransitivity
-INT:-a			OptNominalization;
-INT:-o			NonErgativeNegation;
-INT:-ō			NonErgativeNegation;

LEXICON Person
NotMarkingValence;
MarkingValence;

LEXICON NotMarkingValence
@P.SUBJ.1SG@	FirstPersonSingular;
@P.SUBJ.1PL@	FirstPersonPlural;
@P.SUBJ.2PL@	SecondPersonPlural;

LEXICON FirstPersonSingular
-1A.SG:-aw		PostFirstPersonSingular;
-1A.SG:-āw		PostFirstPersonSingular;
-1A.SG:-affu	Enclitic;

LEXICON PostFirstPersonSingular
#;
Nominalization;

LEXICON FirstPersonPlural
-1A:-aw			NonSecondPersonPluralMarker;

LEXICON SecondPersonPlural
-2A.PL:-ašš+o	OptNominalization;				

LEXICON MarkingValence
@P.SUBJ.2SG@	SecondPersonSingular;
@P.SUBJ.3SG@	ThirdPersonSingular;
@P.SUBJ.3PL@	ThirdPersonPlural;

LEXICON SecondPersonSingular
-2A.SG:-ō		OptNominalization;
-2A.SG:-o		OptNominalization;

LEXICON ThirdPersonSingular
-3A.SG:-ā		OptNominalization;
-3A.SG:-a		OptNominalization;

LEXICON ThirdPersonPlural
-3A:-a			NonSecondPersonPluralMarker;

LEXICON NonSecondPersonPluralMarker
-PL:-ž			#;
-PL:-ža			EncliticOrNominalization;

LEXICON EncliticOrNominalization
Enclitic;
Nominalization;

LEXICON Negated
-TR:-i		NegatedEnding;

LEXICON NegatedEnding
@P.SUBJ.1SG@	NegatedFirstPersonSingular;
@P.SUBJ.1PL@	NegatedFirstPersonPlural;
@P.SUBJ.3SG@	NegatedThirdPersonSingular;
@P.SUBJ.2PL@	NegatedSecondPersonPlural;

LEXICON NegatedFirstPersonSingular
-1A.SG.NEG:-uffu	OptNominalization;

LEXICON NegatedFirstPersonPlural
-1A.PL.NEG:-uffu	NonSecondPersonPluralMarker;

LEXICON NegatedThirdPersonSingular
-3A.SG:-a		ErgIndNegation;
-3A.SG:-ā		ErgIndNegation;

LEXICON NegatedSecondPersonPlural
-2A.PL.NEG:-ošš+o	OptNominalization;

LEXICON ErgIndNegation
<%-NEG .x. %- m (m) A>	OptNominalization;

LEXICON OptNominalization
Nominalization;
WordBoundary;

LEXICON Nominalization
-NMN:-šše		PostNominalization;
-NMN:-šš(e)		VocalicCase;

LEXICON PostNominalization
Absolutive;
ConsonantalCase;
Relator;

LEXICON Verb
ag		vi; ! sich erheben
ag		vt; ! aufnehmen; tragen, bringen; führen, lenken, leiten
al		vt; ! sagen
am		vt; ! ansehen
am		vt; ! brennen
an		vt;
ar		vt; ! geben
id		vt; ! schlagen
ul		vt; ! fressen
un		vi; ! kommen
ūn		vi; ! kommen
un		vt; ! bringen
ūn		vt; ! bringen
ūr		vt; ! wollen
ḫā		vt; ! nehmen
ḫu		vt; ! rufen
pa		vt; ! bauen
āmm		vt; ! erreichen
ašḫ		vt; ! opfern
ašk		vt; ! fragen?
ašš		vt; ! waschen, abwaschen
irn		vt;
itk		vt; ! reinigen
itt		vi; ! gehen
faž		vt; ! invade
fur		vt; ! sehen
fūr		vt; ! sehen
ḫab		vi; ! gehen
ḫan		vt; ! gebären
ḫāž		vt; ! hören
ḫaž		vt; ! hören
ḫāl		vt; ! carry away
ḫic		vt; ! grieve
ḫil		vt; ! mitteilen
ḫub		vt; ! zerstören
ḫuž		vt; ! binden
kad		vt; ! sprechen
kād		vt; ! sprechen
keb		vt; ! tragen
kel		vt; ! satisfy
kev		vt; ! legen
kir		vt;
kīr		vt;
kol		vt; ! let aside
kōl		vt; ! let aside
kul		vt; ! sagen
kūd		vt;
kūd		vi; ! fallen
kut		vi; ! fallen
koz		vt; ! zurückhalten
mād		vi; ! be wise
meġ		vi;
mēġ		vi;
mel		vt; ! expell
muž		vt; ! shape
mūž		vt; ! shape
naḫ		vt; ! sehen
nāv		vi; ! grasen
pal		vt; ! wissen, kennen
pār		vt; ! draw
ped		vt;
pic		vi; ! rejoice
piž		vt; ! spit out
puġ		vt; ! exchange
pūz		vt; ! dip
šid		vt; ! verfluchen
šir		vt; ! singen
šār		vt; ! wünschen
tab		vt; ! gießen
tād		vt; ! lieben
tag		vi; ! be resplendent
tal		vt; ! ausziehen
tān		vt; ! machen
tān		vi; ! machen
tav		vt; ! cast
taž		vt; ! add
teġ		vi; ! grow up
tēl		vt; ! increase
ton		vt; ! equip
tūn		vt; ! overcome
tūr		vi; ! go down
zaz		vt; ! zu essen geben, verköstigen
alad	vt; ! zahlen, kaufen
faġr	vt; ! be good towards
ḫalv	vt; ! enclose
ḫemz	vt; ! binden; gürten
ḫezm	vt; ! binden; gürten
ḫill	vt; ! sagen
ḫubl	vt; ! zerbrechen
kunz	vi; ! sich niederwerfen
naḫḫ	vi; ! sitzen, sich setzen
naḫḫ	vt; ! sitzen lassen
nakk	vt; ! entlassen, freilassen
nakk	vi;
parn	vt;
pašš	vt; ! schicken
sull	vt; ! legare
sull+ud	vt; ! slegare
samm	vt; ! strappare
sikk	vt; ! brechen
sugm	vi; ! eintreten
šalġ	vt; ! heed
šeḫl	vi; ! rein sein
šial	vi; ! stack
šild	v;
tapš	vi; ! rebel
tašp	vt; ! zerstören
zimz 	vt;
šeġal	vi; ! be pure
šeġel	vi; ! rein sein
firvir	vt; ! lösen
šin+apš	vi; ! cambiare
sul+ud	vt; ! lösen
talmōv	vi; ! grow big
kel+gel	vt; ! hoch stellen
keli+gel	vt; ! hoch stellen
ale		vi; ! approach
ḫimz+atḫ	vt;
pic+and		vt;
tupp	vi; ! vorhanden sein
mann	vs; ! sein
mānn	vs; ! sein
tupp	vs; ! vorhanden sein
ur		vs; ! existieren
